Massachusetts, session 194th, H1093.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 176D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 3B, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition:-
Section 3C. (a) As used in this section, the term “insurer” means any: (1) insurance
company which provides for payment or reimbursement of health care expenses, health care
services, under a policy of insurance or an insurance contract with an individual or group,
including the group insurance commission; (2) operator of any medical service plan and hospital
service plan pursuant to chapter 176A, 176B or176C; and (3) carriers and health maintenance
organizations as defined in chapter 176G.
(b) When an individual settles a claim, whether in litigation or otherwise, against another
for personal injuries, medical, dental or podiatric malpractice, or wrongful death, it shall be
conclusively presumed that the settlement does not include any compensation for the cost of
health care services, loss of earnings or other economic loss to the extent those losses or
of 2

expenses have been or are obligated to be paid or reimbursed by an insurer. By entering into any
such settlement, an individual shall not be deemed to have taken an action in derogation of any
right of any insurer that paid or is obligated to pay those losses or expenses; nor shall an
individual’s entry into such settlement constitute a violation of any contract between the
individual and such insurer.
No individual entering into such a settlement shall be subject to a subrogation claim or
claim for reimbursement by an insurer and an insurer shall have no lien or right of subrogation or
reimbursement against any such settling individual or any other party to such a settlement, with
respect to those losses or expenses that have been or are obligated to be paid or reimbursed by
said insurer.
(c) A violation of this section shall be an unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the
business of insurance.
of 2